Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1201.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8 of the act of July 2, 1935 (P.L.589, No.210), referred to as the Milk Sanitation Law, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 8. "Raw Milk" shall be produced and handled in the following manner:* * *(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the "secretary" shall allow every holder of a permit to sell raw milk to sell milk products containing "Raw Milk" and manufactured dairy products containing "Raw Milk."1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 2. The provisions of 7 Pa. Code § 59a.402(b) are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of section 8(f) of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1201PN1349 - 2 - 1234